Hawaii statutes.
[§346-364] Contract or conveyance to the department.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the board of land and natural
resources or other state agency holding lands and improvements may contract or
otherwise convey at a nominal consideration, by direct negotiation and without
recourse to public auction, the land and improvements, or the management,
operation, and administrative responsibility over the land and improvements, to
the department or its designee. The land and improvements shall be used by the
department or its designee for homeless facilities or for any other program for
the homeless authorized by this part. [L 2010, c 89, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next